Illinois, session 104th, HB196.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Police Dog Retirement Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (510 ILCS 82/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Police Dog Retirement Act.9(Source: P.A. 99-817, eff. 1-1-17.)